California statutes. Education Code
(c) For each fiscal year, the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide the department with the appropriate data identified in subdivision (a), as follows:

(1) The average daily population for foster youth 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, at
 short-term residential therapeutic programs and community treatment facilities.

(2) The number on April 1 of children and youth (A) 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services, and (B) 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in community care facilities licensed by the State Department of Social Services.

(d) In determining the amount of the first and second principal apportionment for a fiscal year pursuant to Section 41332, the
 Superintendent shall continue to apportion funds from Section A of the State School Fund to each special education local plan area based on the amount apportioned in the prior fiscal year.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community treatment facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Foster youth” has the same meaning as defined in Section 42238.01.

(3) “Short-term residential therapeutic program” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11400 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 52.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.173.

(a) For the fiscal years 2004–05 to 2006–07, inclusive, the department shall apportion to each special education local plan area the amount determined as follows:

(1) For the 2004–05 and 2005–06 fiscal years, the amount apportioned shall be as follows:

(A) If the out-of-home care funding amount calculated for a special education local plan area is less than or equal to the amount a special education local plan area received pursuant to former Sections 56836.16 and 56836.17 for the 2002–03 fiscal year, the special education local plan area shall receive the same amount it received for the 2002–03 fiscal year. For purposes of this section, the amount of
 funding received by a special education local plan area for the 2002–03 fiscal year shall be based on the annual recertification of the 2002–03 fiscal year, as certified by the department in July of 2004.

(B) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), special education local plan areas shall receive the amount received for the 2002–03 fiscal year plus the amount calculated in subparagraph (C).

(C) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), each special education local plan area shall also receive the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount for the special education local plan area and the amount received for the 2002–03 fiscal year for that special education local plan area divided by the sum of the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount and the amount
 received in the 2002–03 fiscal year for all special education local plan areas
 multiplied by the amount of funds provided for Section 56836.165 in the annual Budget Act that has not been allocated in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(2) For the 2006–07 fiscal year, the amount apportioned shall be as follows:

(A) If the out-of-home care funding amount calculated for a special education local plan area for the 2006–07 fiscal year is less than or equal to the amount a special education local plan area received for the 2005–06 fiscal year, the special education local plan area shall receive the same amount it received for the 2005–06 fiscal year less 20 percent of the difference between the amount received for the 2005–06 fiscal year and the out-of-home care funding amount computed for the 2006–07 fiscal year.

(B) For special education local plan areas other than
 those funded through subparagraph (A), special education local plan areas shall receive the amount received for the 2005–06 fiscal year.

(C) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), each special education local plan area shall also receive the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount for that special education local plan area and the amount received for the 2005–06 fiscal year for that special education local plan area divided by the sum of the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount and the amount received in the 2005–06 fiscal year for all special education local plan areas
 multiplied by the amount of funds provided for Section 56836.165 in the annual Budget Act that has not been allocated in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2007–08 fiscal year, both of the following shall apply:

(A) To the extent that funds are available pursuant to subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or both, not more than 50 percent of the amount determined in this subdivision for the applicable fiscal year shall be apportioned by the auditor of the county containing the applicable county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund to the special education local plan
 area.

(B) The remaining 50 percent of the amount determined in this subdivision for the applicable fiscal year, or more if the applicable county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund does not have sufficient funds to cover the entire percentage pursuant to subparagraph (A), shall be apportioned by the department to the special education local plan area.

(2) For the 2007–08 fiscal year, the total amount apportioned to a special education local plan area pursuant to the formula established in paragraph (1) shall be as follows:

(A) If the out-of-home care funding amount calculated for a special education local plan area for the 2007–08 fiscal year is less than or equal to the amount a special education local plan area received for the 2006–07 fiscal year, the special education local plan area shall receive the same
 amount it received for the 2006–07 fiscal year less 25 percent of the difference between the amount received for the 2006–07 fiscal year and the out-of-home care funding amount computed for the 2007–08 fiscal year.

(B) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), special education local plan areas shall receive the amount received for the 2006–07 fiscal year.

(C) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), each special education local plan area shall also receive the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount for that special education local plan area and the amount received for the 2006–07 fiscal year for that special education local plan area divided by the sum of the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount and the amount received in the 2006–07 fiscal year for all
 special education local plan areas
 multiplied by the amount of funds provided for Section 56836.165 in the annual Budget Act that has not been allocated in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(3) For the 2008–09 fiscal year, the total amount apportioned to a special education local plan area pursuant to the formula established in paragraph (1) shall be as follows:

(A) If the out-of-home care funding amount calculated for a special education local plan area for the 2008–09 fiscal year is less than or equal to the amount a special education local plan area received for the 2007–08 fiscal year, the special education local plan area shall receive the same amount it received for the 2007–08 fiscal year less 33 percent of the difference between the amount received for the 2007–08 fiscal year and the out-of-home care funding amount computed for the 2008–09 fiscal year.

(B) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), special education local plan areas shall receive the amount received for the 2007–08 fiscal year.

(C) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), each special education local plan area shall also receive the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount for that special education local plan area and the amount received for the 2007–08 fiscal year for that special education local plan area divided by the sum of the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount and the amount received in the 2007–08 fiscal year for all special education local plan areas
 multiplied by the amount of funds provided for Section 56836.165 in the annual Budget Act that has not been allocated in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(4) For the 2009–10 fiscal year, the total amount apportioned to a special education local plan area pursuant to the formula established in paragraph (1) shall be as follows:

(A) If the out-of-home care funding amount calculated for a special education local plan area for the 2009–10 fiscal year is less than or equal to the amount a special education local plan area received for the 2008–09 fiscal year, the special education local plan area shall receive the same amount it received for the 2008–09 fiscal year less 50 percent of the difference between the amount received for the 2008–09 fiscal year and the out-of-home care funding amount computed for the 2009–10 fiscal year.

(B) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), special education local plan areas shall receive the amount received for the 2008–09 fiscal year.

(C) For special education local plan areas other than those funded through subparagraph (A), each special education local plan area shall also receive the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount for that special education local plan area and the amount received for the 2008–09 fiscal year for that special education local plan area divided by the sum of the difference between the out-of-home care funding amount and the amount received in the 2008–09 fiscal year for all special education local plan areas
 multiplied by the amount of funds provided for Section 56836.165 in the annual Budget Act that has not been allocated in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(5) For the 2010–11 to 2020–21 fiscal years, inclusive, the total amount apportioned to a special education local plan area pursuant to the formula established in paragraph (1) shall be equal to the amount calculated pursuant to Section 56836.165. If the sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to Section 56836.165 for all special education local plan areas
 exceeds the Budget Act appropriation for this purpose, the department shall apply proportionate reductions to all special education local plan areas.

(6) For the 2021–22 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the total amount apportioned to a special education local plan area pursuant to the formula established in paragraph (1) shall be equal to the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56836.168. If the sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to Section 56836.168 for all special education local plan areas exceeds the annual Budget Act appropriation for this purpose, the department shall apply proportionate reductions to all special education local plan areas. If the annual Budget Act appropriation for this purpose exceeds the sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to Section 56836.168 for all special education local plan areas, any
 remaining funding shall be allocated in proportion to each special local plan area’s share of that sum calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56836.168.

(c) A county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund shall not be required to provide funding for special education programs funded pursuant to this section based on clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or both, for a fiscal year before the 2007–08 fiscal year that it has not already provided for these programs
 before the start of the 2007–08 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 101.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.175.

For purposes of this article, a “skilled nursing facility” shall have the same meaning as specified in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall be under contract with the State Department of Health Services to provide pediatric subacute care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 584, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.18.

(a) The superintendent shall establish and maintain an emergency fund for the purpose of providing relief to special education local plan areas when a licensed children’s institution, foster family home, residential medical facility, or other similar facility serving individuals with exceptional needs opens or expands in a special education local plan area during the course of the school year which impacts the special education local plan area, or when a pupil is placed in a facility for which no public or state-certified nonpublic program exists within the special education local plan area in which the pupil’s individualized education program can be implemented during the course of the school year and impacts the educational program.

(b) The special education local plan area in which the impaction occurs shall be responsible for submitting a written request to the superintendent for emergency funding. The written request shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Specific information on the new or expanded licensed children’s institution, foster family home, residential medical facility, or other similar facility described in subdivision (a), including information on the new unserved or underserved pupils residing in the facility, or specific information relating to the new unserved or underserved pupils residing in those facilities.

(2) The identification of the steps undertaken demonstrating that no public special education program exists within the special education local plan area capable of programmatically meeting the needs of the identified pupils.

(3) A plan from the special education local plan area describing the services to be provided.

(c) The superintendent shall approve, modify, or disapprove the written request for emergency funding within 30 days of the receipt of the written request and shall notify the special education local plan area administrator, in writing, of the final decision.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that appropriations necessary to fund these emergency situations shall be included in the Budget Act for each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Nonpublic, Nonsectarian School Contracts [56836.20. - 56836.21.]

56836.20.

(a) The cost of master contracts with nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and agencies that a special education local plan area enters into shall not include any of the following costs that a special education local plan area may incur:

(1) Administrative or indirect costs of the special education local plan area.

(2) Direct support costs for the special education local plan area.

(3) Transportation costs provided either directly, or through a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency contract for use of services or equipment owned, leased, or contracted, by a special education
 local plan area for any pupils enrolled in nonpublic,
 nonsectarian schools or agencies, unless provided directly or subcontracted by that nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 56366.

(4) Costs for services routinely provided by the special education local plan area including the following, unless the board grants a waiver under Section 56101:

(A) School psychologist services other than those described in Sections 56324 and 56363 and included in a master contract and individual services agreement under subdivision (a) of Section 56366.

(B) School nurse services other than those described in Sections 49423.5, 56324, and 56363 and included in a master contract and individual services agreement under subdivision
 (a) of Section 56366.

(C) Language, speech, and hearing services other than those included in a master contract and individual services agreement under subdivision (a) of Section 56366.

(D) Modified, specialized, or adapted physical education services other than those included in a master contract and individual services agreement under subdivision (a) of Section 56366.

(E) Other services not specified by a pupil’s individualized education program or funded by the state on a caseload basis.

(5) Costs for nonspecial education programs or settings, including those provided for individuals with exceptional needs between the ages of birth and five years,
 inclusive, pursuant to Sections 56431 and 56441.8.

(6) Costs for nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency placements outside of the state unless the board has granted a waiver pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 56365.

(7) Costs for related nonpublic, nonsectarian school pupil assessments by a school psychologist or school nurse pursuant to Sections 56320 and 56324.

(8) Costs for services that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency is not certified to provide.

(9) Costs for services provided by personnel who do not meet the requirements specified in subdivision (m) of Section 56366.1.

(10) Costs for services provided by public school employees.

(b) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall not claim and is not entitled to receive reimbursement for attendance unless the site where the pupil is receiving special education or designated instruction and services is certified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 579, Sec. 7.   (SB 373)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.21.

(a) The department shall administer an extraordinary cost pool to protect special education local plan areas from the extraordinary costs associated with single placements as described in subdivision (d). Funds shall be appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act. Special education local plan areas shall be eligible for reimbursement from this pool in accordance with this section.

(b) The threshold amount for claims under this section shall be the lesser of the following:

(1) (A) Through the 2019–20 fiscal year, one percent of the allocation calculated pursuant to Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area for the current fiscal year for any special
 education local plan area that meets the criteria in Section 56212.

(B) For the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, one percent of the allocation calculated pursuant to Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area for the 2019–20 fiscal year for any special education local plan area that met the criteria in Section 56212 for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(2) The department shall calculate the average cost of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school placement in the 1997–98 fiscal year. This amount shall be multiplied by 2.5, then by one plus the inflation factor computed pursuant to Section 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013, to obtain the alternative threshold amount for claims in the 1998–99 fiscal year. For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the alternative threshold amount shall be the alternative threshold amount for the prior fiscal year multiplied by
 one plus the inflation factor computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, and shall also include the inflation factor of 2.31 percent instead of zero as described in Section 56836.142 for the 2020–21 fiscal year. For the 2022–23 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the alternative threshold amount shall be the alternative threshold amount for the prior fiscal year multiplied by one plus the inflation factor computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(c) Special education local plan areas are eligible to submit claims for costs exceeding the threshold amount on forms developed by the department. All claims for a fiscal year shall be submitted by October 31 following the close of the fiscal year. If the total amount claimed by special education local plan areas exceeds the amount appropriated, the claims shall be prorated.

(d) Special education local plan areas are eligible to submit claims for the costs of nonpublic, nonsectarian school placements in excess of those in existence in the 1997–98 fiscal year and the costs of special education and related services for pupils who reside in licensed children’s institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 81.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Low Incidence Funding [56836.22. - 56836.22.]

56836.22.

(a) Commencing with the 1985–86 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funds to support special education and related services as required under the individualized education program for each pupil with low-incidence disabilities, as defined in Section 56026.5, shall be determined by dividing the total number of pupils with low-incidence disabilities in the state, as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 60900) of Part 33 on the Fall 1 Census of the prior fiscal year, into the annual appropriation provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(b) The per-pupil entitlement determined
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be multiplied by the number of pupils with low-incidence disabilities in each special education local plan area to determine the total funds available for each local plan.

(c) The Superintendent shall apportion the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (b) to the special education local plan area for purposes of providing special education and related services as required under the individualized education program for each pupil with low-incidence disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 80.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Program Specialists and Administration of Regionalized Operations and Services [56836.23. - 56836.31.]

56836.23.

Funds for regionalized operations and services and the direct instructional support of program specialists shall be apportioned to the special education local plan areas. As a condition of receiving these funds, the special education local plan
 area shall ensure that all functions listed below are performed in accordance with the description set forth in its local plan adopted pursuant to Section 56205:

(a) Coordination of the special education local plan area and the implementation of the local plan.

(b) Coordinated system of identification and assessment.

(c) Coordinated system of procedural safeguards.

(d) Coordinated system of staff development and parent and guardian education.

(e) Coordinated system of curriculum development and alignment with the core curriculum.

(f) Coordinated system of internal program review, evaluation of the effectiveness of the local
 plan, and implementation of a local plan accountability mechanism.

(g) Coordinated system of data collection and management.

(h) Coordination of interagency agreements.

(i) Coordination of services to medical facilities.

(j) Coordination of services to licensed children’s institutions and foster family homes.

(k) Preparation and transmission of required special education local plan area reports.

(l) Fiscal and logistical support of the community advisory committee.

(m) Coordination of transportation services for individuals with exceptional needs.

(n) Coordination of career and vocational education and transition services.

(o) Assurance of full educational opportunity.

(p) Fiscal administration and the allocation of state and federal funds pursuant to Section 56836.01.

(q) Direct instructional program support that may be provided by program specialists in accordance with Section 56368.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 99.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.24.

(a) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of funding for the purposes specified in Section 56836.23 for apportionment to each special education local plan area for the fiscal year in which the computation is made:

(1) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations:

(A) Compute the statewide average for program specialists and regionalized services, excluding the amount computed for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education
 Local Plan Area, for the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(B) Multiply the computed amount in subparagraph (A) by one plus the inflation factor for the 2013–14 to 2017–18 fiscal years, inclusive, computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(C) Multiply the amount computed in subparagraph (B) by one plus the inflation factor for the 2018–19 fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(D) Multiply the amount computed in subparagraph (C) by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 56836.10 for the special education local plan area.

(2) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following
 computations:

(A) Multiply the 2018–19 fiscal year statewide average amount by one plus the inflation factor for the 2019–20 fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(B) Multiply the amount computed in subparagraph (A) by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area.

(3) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations:

(A) Multiply the 2019–20 fiscal year statewide average amount by one plus the inflation factor for the 2020–21 fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(B) Multiply the amount computed in subparagraph (A) by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(4) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations:

(A) Multiply the 2020–21 fiscal year statewide average amount by one plus the inflation factor for the 2021–22 fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, and include the inflation factor of 2.31 percent instead of zero as described in Section 56836.142 for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(B) Multiply the amount computed in subparagraph (A) by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(5) For the 2022–23 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make the following computations:

(A) Multiply the prior year fiscal year statewide average amount by one plus the inflation factor for the current fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(B) Multiply the amount computed in subparagraph (A) by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(b) For purposes of this section, a special education local plan area that only includes charter schools shall be apportioned by the Superintendent for each unit of average daily attendance reported pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 56836.06 for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 103.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.25.

Funds received pursuant to this article shall be expended for the purposes specified in Section 56836.23.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 101.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.29.

If special education local plan areas reorganize, including by merger or division, the department shall adjust rates for payments to and from the resulting special education local plan areas so that overall funding neither increases nor decreases from what it would have been before the reorganization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 61.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.31.

(a) To accomplish the activities set forth in Section 56836.23, supplemental funds shall be apportioned to special education local plan areas that are designated as necessary small special education local plan areas in accordance with Section 56212 and that report fewer than 15,000 units of average daily attendance.

(b) For the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2017–18 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall allocate the supplemental amount described in subdivision (a) based on the following computations:

(1) Calculate the difference between the number of units of average daily attendance reported for the necessary small special education local plan area for the current fiscal year and 15,000
 units of average daily attendance.

(2) Multiply the
 difference calculated in paragraph (1) by the rate calculated in subdivision (c).

(c) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, the supplemental rate per unit of average daily attendance shall be fifteen dollars ($15). For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the supplemental rate per unit of average daily attendance shall be fifteen dollars ($15) multiplied by one plus the inflation factor computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1 for the current fiscal year.

(d) For the 2018–19 and 2019–20 fiscal years, the Superintendent shall allocate the supplemental amount described in subdivision (a) based on the following computations:

(1) Calculate the difference between the number of units of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.24 for
 the necessary small special education local plan area and 15,000 units of average daily attendance.

(2) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the supplemental rate per unit of average daily attendance shall be the rate computed pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.24. For the 2019–20 fiscal year, the supplemental rate per unit of average daily attendance shall be the rate computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.24.

(3) Multiply the
 difference calculated in paragraph (1) by the rate calculated in paragraph (2).

(e) For the 2020–21 fiscal
 year, the Superintendent shall allocate the supplemental amount described in subdivision (a) by taking the difference calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) for the 2019–20 fiscal year and multiplying it by the supplemental rate per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.24.

(f) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall allocate the supplemental amount described in subdivision (a) by taking the difference calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) for the 2019–20 fiscal year and multiplying it by the supplemental rate per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.24.

(g) For the 2022–23 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall allocate the supplemental amount described in subdivision (a) by taking the difference calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) for the 2019–20 fiscal year and multiplying it by the supplemental rate per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.24.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 104.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Special Education Early Intervention Preschool Grant [56836.39. - 56836.40.]

56836.39.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) A quality education ensures that pupils receive appropriate interventions and services as needed before the pupil falls behind academically.

(b) Early intervention services and supports provided to children who are at risk of falling significantly behind, including children with disabilities, can reduce the need for additional services in future years.

(c) Pupils with disabilities who are taught within the general education classroom with supports and systematic instruction achieve better outcomes in the areas of academics, communication, and behavior.

(d) In order to ensure the success of pupils with disabilities, additional resources for early intervention and preschool should be provided to school districts to support young learners with disabilities and those at risk of requiring related services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 55.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.40.

(a) For any fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of funding for each school district for the special education early intervention preschool grant:

(1) For each school district, determine the total number of pupils in grade 1 with exceptional needs residing in that school district using
 Fall 1 Census special education data.

(2) The sum of the totals determined pursuant to paragraph (1) is the “total statewide number of preschool children with exceptional needs” for the applicable fiscal year.

(3) Calculate a per pupil special education early intervention preschool grant by dividing the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for purposes of this section by the total statewide number of preschool children with exceptional needs
 calculated in paragraph (2).

(4) Calculate the special education early intervention preschool grant for each school district by multiplying the per pupil grant calculated in paragraph (3) by the total number calculated in paragraph
 (1) for the school district.

(5) The Superintendent shall allocate the amount of funds calculated for each school district in paragraph (4) to the applicable school district.

(b) The funds allocated pursuant to this section
 shall supplement existing special education resources currently required to be provided pursuant to federal and state law and promote a targeted focus on services and supports being offered in inclusive settings, to the extent practicable.

(c) Funding allocated to school districts under this section shall be used to provide services and supports in inclusive settings that have been determined to improve school readiness and long-term outcomes for infants, toddlers, and preschool pupils from birth to five years of age, inclusive, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Early intervention services, including preschool and supportive services for children from birth to five years of age, inclusive, who are not meeting age-appropriate
 developmental milestones and are at risk for being identified as eligible for special education and related services. This may include children who received individualized family support plan services but did not qualify for an individualized education program, and children who have not received an individualized family support plan nor an individualized education program.

(2) One-time programs, services, or resources for preschool children with exceptional needs that may not be medically or educationally necessary or required by an individualized education program or in an individualized family support plan, but which the school district has determined will have a positive impact on a young child.

(3) Strategies to improve pupil outcomes as identified through the state system of support, including inclusive educational programming that ensures a pupil’s right to placement in the
 least restrictive educational environment.

(4) Wraparound services for preschool children with exceptional needs not required by federal or state law.

(5) Expansion of inclusive practices to ensure that preschool children with exceptional needs have access to learn in the least restrictive environment.

(6) Professional development for preschool teachers, administrators, and paraprofessionals on evidence-based strategies to build capacity to serve preschool children with exceptional needs in more inclusive settings. This professional development may also include training for teachers, administrators, and paraprofessionals on the development of physical, social, emotional, and academic skills and on developing appropriate individualized education programs for preschool children with exceptional needs that ensure access
 to a free, appropriate public education in the least restrictive environment.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Preschool child with exceptional needs” means a child between three and five years of age, inclusive, who has been identified as an individual with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, and is receiving individualized education program services, except those enrolled in kindergarten or a transitional kindergarten program.

(2) “Transitional kindergarten”
 means the first year of a two-year kindergarten program that uses a modified kindergarten curriculum that is age and developmentally appropriate.

(3) “Wraparound services” means integrated services and supports that address a child’s holistic needs, including, but not limited to, academic, health, and social services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 105.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Federal Funding Allocations [56837. - 56844.]

56837.

For each fiscal year for which federal funds under Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 set seq.) are allocated to the state pursuant to subsection (d) of Section 1411 of Title 20 of the United States Code, the federal funding for local entitlements shall be allocated through the annual Budget Act in the following manner:
